test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-list_id_gt-norm.gen.yaml
    murâštiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: muurâšt
    muttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: muttiim
    muttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: mottee
    muttâniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: muttân
    muvgâgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: muuvgâg
    muvrediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: muuvred
    muáculiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: muácul
    muáittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: muáitám
    muálkkiluttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: muálkkilutám
    muárdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: muárdám
    muáráskiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: muáráásk
    muávrádiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: muávrád
    mučismittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: mučismitám
    muštottiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: muštoot
    muštâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: muštâl
    muštâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: muuštâš
    mučásmiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: muččáásm
    mučâsmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: mučâsmitám
    mučâsmiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: muuččâsm
    mučâšiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: muuččâš
    myelliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: muálá
    myensteristiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: myensteristám
    myetistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: myetist
    mášudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: mááššud
    mäksiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: máávsám
    mälistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: määlist
    mälttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: mááltám
    mänidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: määnid
    mättiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: máátám
    mävsittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: määvsit
    nabdestiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nabdeest
    naggiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: naggiim
    naggiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: näggee
    nahciđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nahciim
    nahciđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nähcee
    nahettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nahheet
    nanosmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nanosmitám
    nanosmiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: naanoosm
    nanošiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nannooš
    narriđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: narriim
    narriđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: närree
    navaliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: navvaal
    navdâšiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: naavdâš
    naveldiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: naaveeld
    navigistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: navigistám
    navkkaattiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: navkkat
    navliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: navliim
    navliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nävlee
    neskiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: niäskám
    nevttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: niävtám
    nieidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nieidiim
    nievridiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nievrid
    nirviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nirviim
    nistettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nisteet
    nivsettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: niivset
    niävruttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: niävrut
    njaddodiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njaddod
    njadestiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njaddeest
    njadettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njaddeet
    njadostiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njaddoost
    njagottiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njaggoot
    njaijiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njaijiim
    njalahistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njalahistám
    njalaniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njallaan
    njalhostiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njalhoost
    njalpettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njalppeet
    njalčattiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njalččaat
    njamasiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njammaas
    njamestiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njaameest
    njavhâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njaavhâst
    njavâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njaavvât
    njeeijiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njiäjám
    njeeijiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njiäjá
    njeidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njiäidám
    njepčiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njiäpčá
    njibžettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njibžettâm
    njibžâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njiibžâst
    njielâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njielâst
    njihinjistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njihinjistám
    njihânjistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njihânjistám
    njivottiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njivvoot
    njivádiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njivváád
    njiäládiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njiäláád
    njiäpčuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njiäpčut
    njiäpčááttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njiäpčát
    njocârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njooccârd
    njolgestiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njolgeest
    njolpettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njolppeet
    njolpáttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njolppáát
    njommiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njommiim
    njommâsiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njommâs
    njomâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njoomât
    njopálistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njopálistám
    njorijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njoorijd
    njorriđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njorriim
    njorriđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njuárree
    njorttâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njorttâd
    njoveldiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njooveeld
    njovhâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njoovhât
    njočârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njooččârd
    njulpettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njulppeet
    njulppâsiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njulppâs
    njulčâhittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njulčâhitám
    njunevuálástiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njunevuáláást
    njunniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njunniim
    njuolgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njuolgiim
    njuolgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njyelgee
    njuorâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njuorâd
    njuorâsmiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njuorâsm
    njuoskâšiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njuoskâš
    njuovâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njuovâd
    njurgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njurgiim
    njuvgâgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njuuvgâg
    njuvâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njuuvâst
    njuálccudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njuálccut
    njuálcáttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njuálccát
    njuáludiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njuálud
    njuálustiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njuálust
    njuámudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njuámmud
    njuámuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njuámut
    njuámádiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njuámmád
    njuárgustiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njuárgust
    njuárguttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njuárgut
    njuárustiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njuárust
    njuškiittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njuškit
    njuškiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njuškiim
    njuškiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njuškee
    njuškodiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njuškood
    njuškottiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njuškoot
    njyebžiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njuábžám
    njyeskistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njyeskist
    njálgásmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njálgásmitám
    njálgásmiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njáálgásm
    njálmádiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njáálmád
    njápčááttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njápčát
    njárbudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njáárbud
    njávgádiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njáávgád
    njäbbiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njábbá
    njävgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njáávgám
    njävhistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njäävhist
    noddiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: noddiim
    noddiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: noddee
    nohádistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nohádistám
    nohádittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: noháditám
    nohádiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nohháád
    nolládiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nolláád
    nomâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: noomât
    nonniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nonniim
    nonniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nannee
    noskettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: noskeet
    noskáttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: noskáát
    novdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: novdiim
    nođhâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: noođhâst
    nubásmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nubásmitám
    nubásmiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nubbáásm
    nuhostiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nuhhoost
    nuhâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nuuhâst
    nulhediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nulheed
    nulpâgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nuulpâg
    nuládiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nulláád
    nuolâsiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nuollâs
    nuolâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nuolâst
    nuolâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nuolâttâm
    nuorâsmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nuorâsmitám
    nuorâsmiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nuorâsm
    nuorâšiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nuorrâš
    nuoskušiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nuoskuš
    nuottiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nuottiim
    nuottiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nyettee
    nurdâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nuurdâst
    nurvostiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nurvoost
    nurvottiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nurvoot
    nurâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nuurâd
    nurâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nuurrâl
    nutâgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nuuttâg
    nuvâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nuuvvât
    nuáigistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nuáigist
    nuálusiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nuállus
    nuárvádiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nuárvád
    nuáskudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nuáskud
    nuáskášiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nuáskáš
    nuástiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nuástám
    nuávdittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nuávdit
    nuáđásiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nuáđđás
    nuđhâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nuuđhât
    nyeskidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nyeskid
    náguttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: náággut
    näittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nááitám
    nälistittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nälistitám
    ohtiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ohtiim
    ohtâlistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ohtâlistám
    okâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ookkât
    olgoštittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: olgoštitám
    olgoštiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: olgoošt
    olliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: olliim
    olliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: uállee
    olášuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: olášut
    omâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: oomâst
    omâšiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: oomâš
    ooviittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: oovit
    opsijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: oopsijd
    opâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ooppâd
    opâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ooppât
    ornijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jieijâs
    orniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: orniim
    orniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: uárnee
    orodiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: oorood
    orosistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: orosistám
    orostistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: orostistám
    orostittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: orostitám
    orostiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ooroost
    oskeldiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: oskeeld
    oskottiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: oskoot
    ostâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ostâd
    ovdediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: oovded
    ovdištiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: oovdišt
    ovdâhistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ovdâhistám
    ovtâstittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ovtâstitám
    oškâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ooškâst
    pacâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: paaccâd
    pacâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: paaccât
    paddâsiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: paddâs
    paggiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: paggiim
    paggiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: päggee
    pahadiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: paahaad
    pahudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: paahud
    pahâdistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pahâdistám
    pahâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: paahâd
    paimândiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: paaimând
    paimâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: paaimât
    pajaniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: paijaan
    pajediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: paajeed
    pajettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: paijeet
    pajâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: paaijâš
    palaskiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: paalaask
    paldettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: paldeet
    paldâlistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: paldâlistám
    palijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: paalijd
    palliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: palliim
    pallâhistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pallâhistám
    pallâkyettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pallâkuádám
    pancârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: paancârd
    panniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: panniim
    panniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pännee
    panttiittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: panttit
    panâštiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: paanâšt
    pappaattiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pappat
    parahittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: parahitám
    pargeldiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pargeeld
    paseliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: passeel
    pasettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: passeet
    paskiittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: paskit
    pasottiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: passoot
    pastalmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pastalmitám
    pastalmiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pastaalm
    patârittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: patâritám
    patâriđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: paattâr
    pavestiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pavveest
    paštuuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: paštuuttâm
    paŋâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: paaŋŋâl
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: piävám
    peggiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: piägám
    pehtilistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pehtilistám
    pehtilittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pehtilitám
    peittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: piäitám
    pelhittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: peelhit
    pelidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: peellid
    pelkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: piälhám
    perbildiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: peerbild
    perriđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: perriim
    perriđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: perree
    perustiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: peerust
    pestittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pestid
    pestiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pestiim
    pestiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: piästám
    pestiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pestee
    pettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: piätám
    pettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: piättá
    pevâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: peevvâč
    peđeččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: peeđeeč
    peđeččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: peeđeeš
    peškittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: peeškit
    peškiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: piäšká
    peŋkâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: peeŋkâst
    pieggiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pieggee
    piegguuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: piegguuttâm
    piegâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pieggâd
    pierbildiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pierbild
    piergiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: piergiim
    piergiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: piergee
    piervâldiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: piervâld
    pieđgiittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pieđgit
    pieđgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pieđgiim
    pieđgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pieđgee
    pikkâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pikkâd
    pilkkediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pilkked
    pillediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pilled
    pinodiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pinnood
    pintediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pintteed
    pircostiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pirccoost
    pirâstittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pirâstit
    pirâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: piirâst
    pissiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pissiim
    pissiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pissee
    pisániđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pissáán
    pittádiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pittád
    pivnohistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pivnohistám
    pivtâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: piivtâst
    pivâldiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: piivâld
    piäguttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: piäggut
    piäiváduttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: piäivádutám
    piäládiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: piällád
    piävtálmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: piävtálmitám
    piävuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: piävvut
    piäđguidittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: piäđguiditám
    piäđguidittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: piäđguidit
    piäškuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: piäškut
    piäškádiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: piäškád
    piäškááttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: piäškát
    piŋijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: piiŋijd
    piškerdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: piškeerd
    piškádiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: piškáád
    poggâgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pooggâg
